Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 1
COLORADO INDIGENT CARE PROGRAM

25.5-3-101. Short title.

This part 1 shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Indigent Care Program".

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1802, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-15-101 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-3-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby determines, finds, and declares that:

The state has insufficient resources to pay for all medical services for persons who are indigent and must therefore allocate available resources in a manner that will provide treatment of those conditions constituting the most serious threats to the health of such medically indigent persons, as well as increase access to primary medical care to prevent deterioration of the health conditions among medically indigent people; and

Such allocation of resources will require the prioritization of medical services by providers and the coordination of administration and delivery of medical services.

The general assembly further determines, finds, and declares that the eligibility of medically indigent persons to receive medical services rendered under the conditions specified in subsection (1) of this section exists only to the extent of available appropriations, as well as to the extent of the individual provider facility's physical, staff, and financial capabilities. The general assembly also recognizes that the program for the medically indigent is a partial solution to the health-care needs of Colorado's medically indigent citizens. Therefore, medically indigent persons accepting medical services from such program shall be subject to the limitations and requirements imposed in this part 1.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1802, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-15-102 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-3-103. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Emergency care" means treatment for conditions of an acute, severe nature which are life, limb, or disability threats requiring immediate attention, where any delay in treatment would, in the judgment of the responsible physician, threaten life or loss of function of a patient or viable fetus.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the state department.

"General provider" means a general hospital, birth center, or community health clinic licensed or certified by the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a)(I) or (1)(a)(II); a federally qualified health center, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(4); a rural health clinic, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(2); a health maintenance organization issued a certificate of authority pursuant to section 10-16-402; and the health sciences center when acting pursuant to section 25.5-3-108 (5)(a)(I) or (5)(a)(II)(A). For the purposes of the program, "general provider" includes associated physicians.

"Health sciences center" means the schools of medicine, dentistry, nursing, and pharmacy established by the regents of the university of Colorado under section 5 of article VIII of the Colorado constitution.

"Program" means the program for the medically indigent established by section 25.5-3-104.

"University hospital" means the university hospital operated pursuant to article 21 of title 23, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1803, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (HB 11-1101), ch. 94, p. 278, § 3, effective April 8; (3) amended, (HB 11-1323), ch. 265, p. 1199, § 3, effective June 2.

L. 2020:

(3) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 288, § 26, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-15-103 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 20-136, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

25.5-3-104. Program for the medically indigent established - eligibility - rules.

A program for the medically indigent is hereby established, to commence July 1, 1983, which shall be administered by the state department, to provide payment to providers for the provision of medical services to eligible persons who are medically indigent. The state board may promulgate rules as are necessary for the implementation of this part 1 in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

A client's eligibility to receive discounted services under the program for the medically indigent shall be determined by rule of the state board based on a specified percentage of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size, which percentage shall not be less than two hundred fifty percent.

No later than June 1, 2022, for providers defined as hospital providers in 10 CCR 2505-10, sec. 8.901.J, the state department shall promulgate rules:

Prohibiting hospitals from considering assets when determining whether a patient meets the specified percentage of the federal poverty line required in subsection (2) of this section; and

Ensuring the method used to determine whether a patient meets the specified percentage of the federal poverty line is uniform across hospitals and aligned with the method for counting income for the purposes of determining eligibility for discounted care, as described in section 25.5-3-503.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1606, § 2, effective June 2; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1803, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2109, § 138, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

(3) added, (HB 21-1198), ch. 435, p. 2885, § 6, effective September 7.

25.5-3-105. Eligibility of legal immigrants for services.

A legal immigrant who is a resident of the state of Colorado shall be eligible to receive services under this part 1 so long as he or she meets the eligibility requirements. As used in this section, "legal immigrant" has the same meaning as described in section 25.5-4-103 (10). As a condition of eligibility for services under this part 1, a legal immigrant shall agree to refrain from executing an affidavit of support for the purpose of sponsoring an alien on or after July 1, 1997, under rules promulgated by the immigration and naturalization service, or any successor agency, during the pendency of such legal immigrant's receipt of services under this part 1. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect a legal immigrant's eligibility for services under this part 1 based upon such legal immigrant's responsibilities under an affidavit of support entered into before July 1, 1997.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1804, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-15-104.3 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-3-106. No public funds for abortion - exception - definitions - repeal.

It is the purpose of this section to implement the provisions of amendment 3 to article V of the Colorado constitution, adopted by the registered electors of the state of Colorado at the general election November 6, 1984, which prohibits the use of public funds by the state of Colorado or its agencies or political subdivisions to pay or otherwise reimburse, directly or indirectly, any person, agency, or facility for any induced abortion.

If every reasonable effort has been made to preserve the lives of a pregnant woman and her unborn child, then public funds may be used pursuant to this section to pay or reimburse for necessary medical services, not otherwise provided for by law.

Any medically necessary services performed pursuant to this section shall be performed only by a provider who is licensed by the state and acting within the scope of the provider's license and in accordance with applicable federal regulations.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2021.)

Any physician who renders necessary medical services pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall report the following information to the state department:

The age of the pregnant woman and the gestational age of the unborn child at the time the necessary medical services were performed;

The necessary medical services which were performed;

The medical condition which necessitated the performance of necessary medical services;

The date such necessary medical services were performed and the name of the facility in which such services were performed.

The information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be compiled by the state department and such compilation shall be an ongoing public record; except that the privacy of the pregnant woman and the attending physician shall be preserved.

For purposes of this section, pregnancy is a medically diagnosable condition.

For the purposes of this section:

"Death" means:

The irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions; or

The irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brain stem.

A determination of death under this section shall be in accordance with accepted medical standards.

"Life-endangering circumstance" means:

The presence of a medical condition, other than a psychiatric condition, as determined by the attending physician, which represents a serious and substantial threat to the life of the pregnant woman if the pregnancy continues to term;

The presence of a lethal medical condition in the unborn child, as determined by the attending physician and one other physician, which would result in the impending death of the unborn child during the term of pregnancy or at birth; or

The presence of a psychiatric condition which represents a serious and substantial threat to the life of the pregnant woman if the pregnancy continues to term. In such case, unless the pregnant woman has been receiving prolonged psychiatric care, the attending licensed physician shall obtain consultation from a licensed physician specializing in psychiatry confirming the presence of such a psychiatric condition. The attending physician shall report the findings of such consultation to the state department.

"Necessary medical services" means any medical procedures deemed necessary to prevent the death of a pregnant woman or her unborn child due to life-endangering circumstances.

If any provision of this section or application thereof is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end, provisions of this section are declared severable.

Use of the term "unborn child" in this section is solely for the purposes of facilitating the implementation of section 50 of article V of the state constitution and its use shall not affect any other law or statute nor shall it create any presumptions relating to the legal status of an unborn child or create or affect any distinction between the legal status of an unborn child and the legal status of a fetus.

This section shall be repealed if section 50 of article V of the Colorado constitution is repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1804, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-142), ch. 168, p. 934, § 2, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-15-104.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

(1) For the text of "amendment 3 to article V of the Colorado constitution" referenced in subsection (1) of this section, see section 50 of article V of the state constitution.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 21-142, see section 1 of chapter 168, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-3-107. Report concerning the program.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the executive director shall prepare an annual report concerning the status of the medically indigent program to be submitted to the health and human services committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, no later than February 1 of each year. The report shall be prepared following consultation with providers in the program, state department personnel, and other agencies, organizations, or individuals as the executive director deems appropriate in order to obtain comprehensive and objective information about the program.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1806, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1060), ch. 6, p. 16, § 6, effective March 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-15-105 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-3-108. Responsibility of the department of health care policy and financing - provider reimbursement - repeal.

The state department shall be responsible for:

Execution of such contracts with providers for partial reimbursement of costs for medical services rendered to the medically indigent as the state department shall determine are necessary for the program;

Promulgation of such reasonable rules as are necessary for the program;

Submission of the report required in section 25.5-3-107; and

Application for federal financial participation under the program.

The contracts required by paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall be negotiated between the state department and the various general providers, as defined in section 25.5-3-103 (3), and shall include contracts with providers to provide tertiary or specialized services. The state department may award such contracts upon a determination that it would not be cost effective nor result in adequate quality of care for such services to be developed by the contract providers, or upon a determination that the contract providers are unable or unwilling to provide such services.

The state department shall establish procedures requiring the provider to provide for proof of indigency to be submitted by the person seeking assistance, but the provider shall be responsible for the determination of eligibility.

The state department shall establish procedures so that the providers of medical services rendered to the medically indigent cover geographic regions of the state.

The responsibilities of providers who provide medical care through the program for the medically indigent are as follows:

Denver health and hospitals, including associated physicians, shall, up to its physical, staff, and financial capabilities as provided for under this program, be the primary providers of medical services to the medically indigent for the city and county of Denver.

University hospital and the physicians and other faculty members of the health sciences center shall, up to their physical, staff, and financial capabilities as provided for under this program, be the primary provider of medical services to the medically indigent for the Denver primary metropolitan statistical area.

University hospital and the physicians and other faculty members of the health sciences center shall be the primary provider of such complex care as is not available or is not contracted for in the remaining areas of the state up to their physical, staff, and financial capabilities as provided for under this program.

Any two or more providers awarded contracts may, with the approval of the state department, redistribute their respective populations and associated funds.

Every provider who provides medical care through the program for the medically indigent shall comply with all procedures established by the state department.

The state department shall establish procedures that allocate funds to providers based on the anticipated utilization of services.

A provider receiving reimbursement pursuant to this section shall transfer a medically indigent patient to another provider only with the prior agreement of the provider.

Every provider receiving reimbursement pursuant to this section shall prioritize for each fiscal year the medical services which it will be able to render, within the limits of the funds which will be made available by the state department.

Such medical services shall be prioritized in the following order:

Emergency care for the full year;

Any additional medical care for those conditions the state department determines to be the most serious threat to the health of medically indigent persons;

Any other additional medical care.

A provider receiving reimbursement pursuant to this section shall not be liable in civil damages for refusing to admit for treatment or for refusing to treat any medically indigent person for a condition which the state department or the provider has determined to be outside of the scope of the program.

A medically indigent person who wishes to be determined eligible for assistance under this part 1 shall comply with the eligibility requirements set by the state department.

A medically indigent person requesting assistance under this part 1 specifically authorizes the state department or provider to:

Use any information required by the eligibility requirements set by the state department for the purpose of verifying eligibility; and

Obtain records pertaining to eligibility from a financial institution, as defined in section 15-15-201 (4), C.R.S., or from any insurance company.

A medically indigent person requesting assistance under this part 1 shall be provided language clearly explaining the provisions of this subsection (10).

With the approval of the state department, any provider awarded a contract may enter into subcontracts or other agreements for services related to the program.

Providers awarded contracts shall not be paid from funds made available for this program up to the extent, if any, of their annual financial obligation under the Hill-Burton act.

When adopting or modifying procedures under this part 1, the state department shall notify each provider, who is contracted to provide medical care through the program for the medically indigent, at least thirty days prior to implementation of a new procedure. The state department shall hold a meeting for all providers at least thirty days prior to the implementation of a new procedure.

The state department shall require any hospital provider who may receive payment under the program to annually submit data relating to the hospital's number of medicaid-eligible in-patient days and the hospital's total in-patient days in a form specified by the state department. The hospital provider shall verify the data to the state department through the program audit procedures required by the state department. The state department shall include this information by hospital in the department's annual budget request to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in the report required by section 25.5-3-107.

To qualify for the program's payment formula disproportionate share hospital factor, as described in rule by the state board consistent with the provisions of this part 1, a hospital provider's percent of medicaid-eligible in-patient days relative to total in-patient days shall be equal to or exceed one standard deviation above the mean.

After receiving approval by the state department, a community health clinic may utilize moneys received pursuant to this article, and any gifts, grants, and donations, for the development and implementation of demonstration projects that may include but need not be limited to coordination of care and disease management.

Subject to adequate funding being made available under section 25.5-4-402.4, the Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise created in section 25.5-4-402.4 (3) shall increase hospital reimbursements up to one hundred percent of hospital costs for providing medical care under the program.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the state fiscal year starting July 1, 2021, and any subsequent fiscal years, if a provider submits a certification of public expenditures pursuant to 42 CFR 433.51 (b), the state department shall retain any federal money payable as reimbursement for the expenditure in excess of fifty percent of the expenditure amount; except that the state department shall only retain the federal money based on the date of service as long as the increased reimbursements and payments pursuant to the federal "Families First Coronavirus Response Act", Pub.L. 116-127, are still available. The state treasurer shall transfer such money to the general fund created in section 24-75-201 for appropriation to the state medical assistance program.

This subsection (20) is repealed, effective December 31, 2024.

Source:

L. 2006:

(1) amended and (16) added, p. 1606, § 3, effective June 2; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1806, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(18) added, (SB 09-264), ch. 204, p. 928, § 4, effective May 1; (17) added, (HB 09-1293), ch. 152, p. 644, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(17) amended, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1447, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(19) added, (HB 20-1385), ch. 173, p. 795, § 1, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(20) added, (SB 21-213), ch. 88, p. 363, § 1, effective May 4.

25.5-3-109. Appropriations.

The general assembly shall make annual appropriations to the state department to accomplish the purposes of this part 1.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1809, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-15-110 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-3-110. Effect of part 1.

This part 1 does not affect the responsibilities of the behavioral health administration in the department of human services for the provision of mental health care in accordance with article 66 of title 27, and this part 1 does not affect any provisions of article 22 of title 23 or any other provisions of law relating to the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1809, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 800, § 64, effective April 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1511, § 65, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-15-111 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-3-111. Penalties.

Any person who represents that any medical service is reimbursable or subject to payment pursuant to this part 1 when the person knows that it is not commits a petty offense. Any person who represents that the person is eligible for assistance pursuant to this part 1 when the person knows that the person is not commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1809, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3241, § 482, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1229), ch. 68, p. 349, § 42, effective March 1.

25.5-3-112. Health care services fund - creation - state plan amendment - primary care special distribution fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the Colorado health care services fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund shall consist of moneys credited thereto pursuant to this section.

In fiscal year 2005-06, the general assembly shall appropriate fourteen million nine hundred sixty-two thousand four hundred eight dollars from the general fund to the fund. Of the moneys in the general fund exempt account created in section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S., the following amounts shall be appropriated by the general assembly to the fund:

In fiscal year 2007-08, fifteen million dollars; and

In fiscal year 2008-09, twelve million nine hundred eighteen thousand seven hundred fifty dollars.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1321), ch. 48, p. 179, § 1, effective March 29, 2010.)

In fiscal year 2009-10, the general assembly shall appropriate ten million three hundred ninety thousand dollars from the general fund to the fund.

In fiscal year 2011-12, the treasurer shall transfer one million dollars from the general fund to the fund.

All moneys appropriated to the fund shall be used as provided in this section and shall not be deposited in or transferred to the general fund of this state or to any other fund. Notwithstanding any provision of section 24-36-114, C.R.S., to the contrary, all interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

(1.5) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (1) of this section to the contrary, on April 20, 2009, the state treasurer shall deduct five hundred thousand dollars from the fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

In fiscal year 2006-07, and each of the two fiscal years thereafter, notwithstanding the requirements of section 25.5-3-108 (8)(b), the moneys deposited into the fund shall be appropriated as follows:

Of the moneys appropriated pursuant to this subsection (2), eighteen percent of the moneys annually appropriated shall be to Denver health and hospitals as the community health clinic provider for the city and county of Denver.

For fiscal year 2006-07, eighty-two percent of the moneys remaining after the appropriation pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be appropriated to community health clinics to provide primary care services pursuant to this article.

For fiscal year 2006-07, eighteen percent of the moneys remaining after the appropriation pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be appropriated to primary care clinics operated by a licensed or certified health-care facility to provide primary care services pursuant to this article.

For fiscal years 2007-08 and 2008-09, the allocation of the moneys remaining after the appropriation pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be determined based on prior utilization as specified in rule by the state board.

(2.5) In fiscal year 2009-10, notwithstanding the requirements of section 25.5-3-108 (8)(b), the moneys deposited into the fund shall be appropriated as follows:

Twenty percent of the moneys shall be appropriated to the state department for distribution to Denver health and hospitals as the community health clinic provider for the city and county of Denver;

Eighty percent of the moneys shall be appropriated to the state department for distribution to community health clinics based upon prior utilizations as determined by the state department to mitigate reductions the clinics experience due to reductions in moneys available from the primary care fund created pursuant to section 24-22-117 (2)(b), C.R.S.

(2.7) In the 2010-11 fiscal year, notwithstanding the requirements of section 25.5-3-108 (8)(b), the moneys deposited into the fund shall be appropriated to the state department for distribution to Denver health and hospitals, as the community health clinic for the city and county of Denver, and to community health clinics. The state department shall develop a distribution formula specifying the distributions based upon prior utilizations and, to the extent possible, mitigation of the reductions in funding that the clinics experience due to reductions in moneys available from the primary care fund established pursuant to section 24-22-117 (2)(b), C.R.S.

(2.8) In the 2011-12 fiscal year, notwithstanding the requirements of section 25.5-3-108 (8)(b), the moneys deposited into the fund shall be appropriated to the state department for distribution to Denver health and hospitals, as the community health clinic for the city and county of Denver, to community health clinics, and to federally qualified health centers. The state department shall develop a distribution formula specifying the distributions based upon prior utilizations and, to the extent possible, mitigation of the reductions in funding that the clinics experience due to reductions in moneys available from the primary care fund established pursuant to section 24-22-117 (2)(b), C.R.S.

The state department shall submit a state plan amendment for federal financial participation for moneys appropriated to primary care clinics operated by a licensed or certified health-care facility. Upon approval of the state plan amendment, the state department is authorized to receive and expend all available federal moneys without a corresponding reduction in spending authority from the fund.

To the extent possible under federal law, the state department shall pursue available federal financial participation for moneys appropriated to community health clinics.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1606, § 4, effective June 2.

L. 2007:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 559, § 1, effective April 16; (2)(b)(III) amended, p. 2043, § 73, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended, p. 276, § 6, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

(1.5) added , (SB 09-208), ch. 149, p. 627, § 31, effective April 20; (1)(b) amended, (SB 09-264), ch. 204, p. 928, § 5, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(b), IP(2), and (2)(b)(III) amended and (1)(b.5), (2.5), and (4) added, (HB 10-1321), ch. 48, p. 179, §§ 1, 2, effective March 29; (4) amended and (2.7) added, (HB 10-1378), ch. 213, p. 927, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2011:

(1)(b.6) and (2.8) added and (4) amended, (SB 11-219), ch. 188, p. 725, §§ 3, 4, 5, effective June 3.